Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Economic Development Bonds for Depressed Counties

152.260.
Definitions for KRS 152.262 to 152.298. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152.262.
Legislative intent. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152.264.
Kentucky Rural Economic Development Authority. [Repealed.]

152.266.
Powers of authority. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152.268.
Administrative staff. [Repealed.]

152.270.
Immunity from personal liability of officers and directors. [Repealed.]

152.272.
Acceptance and expenditure of funds. [Repealed.]

152.274.
Conflict of interest prohibited. [Repealed.]

152.276.
Certification of qualified counties — Selection of eligible companies. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152.278.
Financing agreement — Terms — Payback — Income tax credit — Default. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152.280.
Determination of income tax credit by Revenue Cabinet. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152.282.
Assessment of employees — Tax credit. [Repealed, reenacted, and amended.]

152.284.
Revenue bonds. [Repealed.]

152.286.
Revenue bonds not to be deemed debt of Commonwealth — Payment of expenses of authority. [Repealed.]

152.288.
Security for bonds — Bonds considered a permitted investment. [Repealed.]

152.290.
Effect of pledge of revenues or assets of authority. [Repealed.]

152.292.
Authority’s money deemed to be trust funds. [Repealed.]

152.294.
Enforcement of rights by bond holders or trustees. [Repealed.]

152.296.
Negotiability of bonds and interest coupons. [Repealed.]

152.298.
Refunding obligations. [Repealed.]